New York, session 2025-2026, S4676.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 3305 of the public health law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph (e) to read as follows: 3 (e) to any individual who possesses, sells, administers, prescribes, 4 or distributes any substance containing xylazine expressly intended for 5 administration through injections to cattle or other nonhuman species 6 and that are approved by the federal food and drug administration solely 7 for such use. 8 § 2. Subdivision (e) of schedule I of section 3306 of the public 9 health law is amended by adding a new paragraph 7 to read as follows: 10 (7) Xylazine (N- (2, 6-dimethylphenyl) - 5, 6-dihydro-4H-1,3 thiazin- 11 2-a-mine). This subdivision shall not include any substance containing 12 xylazine expressly intended for administration through injections to 13 cattle or other nonhuman species and that are approved by the federal 14 food and drug administration. Any individual who knowingly and willfully 15 administers to themself or another person, prescribes, dispenses or 16 distributes such substances when any such substance is intended for 17 human consumption or for any purpose other than injection to cattle or 18 nonhuman species shall be subject to the same penalties as any individ- 19 ual or practitioner who violates the provisions of this section, section 20 thirty-three hundred four of this title, or any other penalties 21 prescribed by law. 22 § 3. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 23 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05289-01-5